Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-369.01
Nebraska State Patrol carrier enforcement division; safety audit or compliance review.

Any officer of the Nebraska State Patrol carrier enforcement division may conduct a safety audit or compliance review of a motor carrier.

Laws 1994, LB 358, § 1;

Laws 2006, LB 1007, § 18.